pt-BR: Caixa tipo de acionador da esteira: Automático paralelo; Automático lateral; Estilo Trick (contra-esteira/alavanca); Outro
ko: 스네어 던지기 유형: 패럴렐 스로오프; 사이드 스로오프; 트릭 스타일(버트 플레이트/레버); 기타
nl: Snare throw-off type: Parallelle throw-off; Zijdelingse throw-off; Trick-stijl (butt plate/hendel); Anders
pt-PT: Tipo de desengate da tarola: Automático paralelo; Automático lateral; Tipo Trick (placa de topo/alavanca); Outro
zh-TW: 小鼓響線開關類型: 平行式響弦開關; 側邊響弦開關; Trick 樣式 (響弦座/控制桿); 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta za izbacivanje doboša: Paralelni mehanizam za otpuštanje; Bočni mehanizam za otpuštanje; U stilu Trick (pločica/poluga); Ostalo
el: Τύπος throw-off ταμπούρου: Throw-off παράλληλης δράσης; Πλευρικό throw-off; Τύπου Trick (butt plate/μοχλός); Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta mehanizma za sprostitev mrežice na bobnu: Vzporedni mehanizem; Stranski mehanizem; Slog Trick (zavorna plošča/ročica); Drugo
ru: Тип сбросного механизма малого барабана: Параллельная машинка; Боковая машинка; В стиле Trick (ответная часть/рычаг); Другое
zh-CN: 军鼓响弦开关类型: 平行式松紧器; 侧边式松紧器; Trick 风格（固定板/推杆）; 其他
vi: Loại bật dây bẫy: Cần gạt song song; Cần gạt bên hông; Kiểu Trick (đế kẹp/đòn bẩy); Khác
sk-SK: Typ mechanizmu vypínania strún malého bubna: Paralelný napínač; Bočný napínač; V štýle Trick (protikus/páčka); Iné
fr: Type de déclencheur de timbre: Déclencheur parallèle; Déclencheur latéral; Style Trick (contre-partie/levier); Autre
nb: Type seideavkaster: Parallell seide-utløser; Sideutløser; Trick-stil (bakplate/spak); Annet
ja: スネアスローオフタイプ: パラレルストレイナー; サイドスローオフ; Trick スタイル (バットプレート / レバー); その他
fi: Virvelirummun heittokoneisto: Rinnakkainen mattokoneisto; Sivumattokoneisto; Trick-tyylinen (vastakappale/vipu); Muu
es: Tipo de liberación de la caja: Tensor paralelo; Tensor lateral; Estilo Trick (placa de tope/palanca); Otro
en: Snare throw-off type: Parallel throw-off; Side throw-off; Trick-style (butt plate/lever); Other
de: Typ des Snare-Abwurfs: Parallelabhebung; Seitenabhebung; Trick-Style (Butt-Plate/Hebel); Andere
pl: Typ odciągu werbla: Maszynka równoległa; Maszynka boczna; W stylu Trick (napinacz / dźwignia); Inny
it: Tipo di lancio del rullante: Sgancio parallelo; Sgancio laterale; Stile Trick (controcordiera/leva); Altro
tr: Trampet tel açma/kapama tipi: Paralel açma kapama; Yandan açma kapama; Trick stili (dip plaka/kol); Diğer
sv: Typ av utlösningsmekanism (throw-off): Parallell sejarmekanik; Sidosejarmekanik; Trick-stil (fästplatta/spak); Övrigt
cs: Typ odpouštěcího mechanismu virblu: Paralelní odklápěcí mechanismus; Boční odklápěcí mechanismus; Typ Trick (protikus/páčka); Jiné
hu: Pergőváltó típusa: Párhuzamos sodronyváltó; Oldalsó sodronyváltó; Trick stílusú (rögzítő/kar); Egyéb
lt-LT: Mažojo būgno throw-off tipas: Lygiagretus nuleidiklis; Šoninis nuleidiklis; „Trick“ stiliaus (galinė plokštelė / svirtis); Kita
ro-RO: Tip de manetă/mecanism de cuplare a cordarului: Mecanism paralel; Mecanism lateral; Tip Trick (placă de bază/pârghie); Altele
da: Seidingudløsertype: Parallel throw-off; Side-throw-off; Trick-style (seiding-klemme/håndtag); Andet
bg-BG: Тип механизъм за освобождаване на пружините на малкия барабан: Паралелно освобождаване; Странично освобождаване; Тип Trick (насрещна планка/лост); Друго
th: ประเภทตัวโยนสแนร์: โทรว์ออฟแบบขนาน; โทรว์ออฟด้านข้าง; สไตล์ Trick (บัตเพลต/คันโยก); อื่นๆ